Hawaii, session 2025, SB661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $3,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and operation of programs relating to the development of hemp- and bamboo-based building materials within the department of agriculture, including but not limited to educational seminars, equipment fairs, and approved seed sales. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________